Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 5. Wind and Solar Energy Facilities

History.

2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 97, §§ 4, 5 provides: “There is appropriated three hundred thirty-five thousand seven hundred fifty-four dollars ($335,754.00) from the general fund to the department of environmental quality. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of carrying out the department's duties under this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's 2013-2014 standard biennial budget request.

“The department of environmental quality is authorized to reclassify and fill one (1) natural resource analyst full-time equivalent position which is vacant as of February 17, 2010, to a principal economist full-time equivalent position for purposes of carrying out the department's duties under this act. The appropriation in section 3 of this act shall be reduced dollar for dollar by any funds appropriated in 2010 House Bill 0001 to the department for the vacant position reclassified pursuant to this section.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 18-5-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Industrial siting council” or “council” means the council created by W.S.

35-12-104

;

“Wind energy facility” means any wind powered electrical generation development consisting of an individual wind turbine or multiple wind turbines rated by the manufacturer to generate more than one-half (0.5) megawatt of electricity and includes all lands where the owner or developer has rights to erect wind turbines;

“Enlarge” or “enlargement” means adding additional wind turbines or energy capacity that is not permitted as part of an original permitting process. “Enlarge” or “enlargement” shall not include an improvement made to a permitted wind turbine that maintains the same surface space occupied by the structure that was previously permitted, regardless of the cost of the improvement;

“Owner” means the surface owner of land;

“Facility” includes:

A wind energy facility or a solar energy facility unless the context clearly indicates otherwise;

A wind energy facility or a solar energy facility planned for construction and siting or whose ownership or business structure is organized in a way to circumvent the definition of “facility” or the requirements of this article while engaging in conduct that otherwise would be subject to the requirements of this article. A facility that meets the definition of this subparagraph shall comply with all requirements of this article before locating, erecting, constructing, reconstructing or enlarging the facility.

“Solar energy facility” means a commercial facility with a rated power capacity of more than one-half (0.5) megawatt of electricity from solar power that includes all lands where the owner or developer has rights to erect solar energy facilities, including lands for battery storage.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ii) deleted “or ‘facility’” preceding “means” and substituted “all lands” for “all contiguous lands”; in (a)(iii) substituted “wind turbines or energy capacity that is” for “wind turbines which are” and added the last sentence; and added (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-5-502.
County regulation of wind or solar energy projects; exceptions.

It is unlawful to locate, erect, construct, reconstruct or enlarge a facility without first obtaining a permit from the board of county commissioners in the county in which the facility is located.

If a facility is to be located in two (2) or more counties, a permit shall be obtained in each county in which the facility is to be located.

No wind energy facility constructed or being constructed prior to July 1, 2010 shall be required to have the permit required by this section. No wind energy facility for which an application for a permit has been made to the industrial siting council, or that has received findings of fact, conclusions of law and an order from the industrial siting council, prior to July 1, 2010 shall be required to have the permit required by this section.

Any wind energy facility which is not required to have a permit pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be required to obtain a permit for any enlargement of the facility after July 1, 2010.

No solar energy facility that has obtained final county approval where required or that is constructed or being constructed prior to July 1, 2020 shall be required to have the permit required by this section. Any solar energy facility that is not required to have a permit pursuant to this subsection shall be required to obtain a permit for any enlargement of the facility after July 1, 2020.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) and (b) substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility”; and added (e).

§ 18-5-503.
Application.

To obtain the permit required by W.S.

18-5-502

, the owner or developer of a facility shall submit an application to the board of county commissioners. The application shall:

Certify that reasonable efforts have been undertaken to provide notice in writing to all owners of land within one (1) mile of the proposed facility, to the military installation commander or the commander’s designee if there are any active federal military missile launch or control facilities within five (5) miles of the proposed facility, to the department of transportation and to all cities and towns located within twenty (20) miles of the facility. Notice shall include a general description of the project including its location, projected number and capacity of turbines or solar energy facilities, the likely routes of ingress and egress and the likely location of electric transmission and other related facilities;

Certify that notice of the proposed facility will be published in a newspaper of general circulation in all counties in which the facility will be located at least twenty (20) days prior to the public hearing required by W.S.

18-5-506

. The notice shall include a brief summary of the facility, invite the public to submit comments and identify the time and date of the hearing;

Certify that the proposed facility will comply with all the standards required by W.S.

18-5-504

;

Certify that the proposed facility will comply with all applicable zoning and county land use regulations, which regulations shall be no less stringent than the standards required by this article;

Certify that a written emergency management plan has been submitted for review and comment to the county fire warden, county emergency management coordinator and the county sheriff. If the permit is granted, the plan shall be supplemented and revised following construction of the facility and prior to its operation if there are any variations in the facility’s construction which would materially impact the original emergency management plan;

Provide a waste management plan that includes an inventory of estimated solid wastes and a proposed disposal program for the construction, operation and eventual decommissioning of the proposed facility;

Provide evidence sufficient for the board of county commissioners to determine if the proposed facility has adequate legal access. The application also shall describe how private roadways within the facility will be marked as private roadways and shall acknowledge that no county is required to repair, maintain or accept any dedication of the private roadways to the public use. The application also shall include a traffic study of any public roadways leading to and away from the proposed facility and the board of county commissioners and department of transportation may require the applicant to enter into a reasonable road use agreement for the use of county roads or state highways prior to construction of the facility;

Provide a project plan indicating the proposed roadways, tower locations, substation locations, transmission, collector and gathering lines and other ancillary facility components. If the application is granted, the board of county commissioners shall require that the project plan be revised to show the final location of all facilities;

Certify that there shall be no advertising or promotional lettering on any solar energy facility, tower, turbine, nacelle or blade beyond the manufacturer’s or the applicant’s logo on the solar energy facility or the nacelle of the turbine;

Provide a site and facility reclamation and decommissioning plan which indicates the planned life of the facility and the means by which the facility and its site will be decommissioned and reclaimed at the end of the facility’s life and which certifies that any owner of land within the facility and its site who is not the applicant has been consulted in development of the reclamation and decommissioning plan. Such plan shall comply with all requirements adopted by the industrial siting council under W.S. 35-12-105(d). If the permit is granted, the plan shall be updated every five (5) years until site reclamation and decommissioning is complete;

For wind energy facilities and solar energy facilities not meeting the definition of an industrial facility as defined in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G), provide a detailed summary of any significant adverse environmental, social or economic effects that the proposed facility may have together with any preliminary plans developed to alleviate any of the adverse effects.

A facility subject to this article shall meet the requirements adopted pursuant to W.S. 35-12-105(d) and (e) regardless of whether the facility is referred to the industrial siting council pursuant to W.S.

18-5-509

or is otherwise subject to the industrial siting act.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a), (a)(i) through (a)(iv), (a)(vi), (a)(vii), (a)(ix) through (a)(xi), and (b) substituted “facility” for “wind energy facility” throughout; in (a)(i) added “to the military installation commander or the commander's designee if there are any active federal military missile launch or control facilities within five (5) miles of the proposed facility, to the department of transportation” preceding “and to all cities,” substituted “projected number and capacity of turbines or solar energy facilities” for “projected number of turbines and,” and added “and the likely location of electric transmission and other related facilities” at the end; in (a)(vii), substituted “county commissioners and department of transportation may require” for “county commissioners may require” and “county roads or state highways” for “county roads”; in (a)(ix) substituted “any solar energy facility, tower” for “any tower” and “logo on the solar energy facility or the nacelle” for “logo on the nacelle”; and in (a)(xi) substituted “wind energy facilities and solar energy facilities” for “wind energy facilities,” “of an industrial facility” for “of a facility,” and “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii).”

§ 18-5-504.
Minimum standards; incorporation into other processes.

No board of county commissioners shall issue a permit for a facility if that facility:

Does not comply with standards properly adopted by the board of county commissioners for the construction of wind energy facilities or solar energy facilities, which standards shall not be less stringent than the standards required by this article, except as allowed by this section;

For wind energy facilities, would locate the base of any tower at a distance of less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the maximum height of the tower from any property line contiguous or adjacent to the facility, unless waived in writing by the owner of every property which would be located closer than the minimum distance;

For wind energy facilities, would locate the base of any tower at a distance of less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the maximum height of the tower from any public road right-of-way;

For wind energy facilities, would construct any tower or other structure, other than underground structures, transmission lines, roadways and structures appurtenant to roadways, at a distance of less than five and one-half (5.5) times the maximum height of the tower, but in no event less than one thousand (1,000) feet from any platted subdivision unless this restriction is waived in writing by the owners of all lands included within the distance specified in this paragraph;

For wind energy facilities, would locate the base of any tower at a distance of less than five and one-half (5.5) times the maximum height of the tower, but in no event less than one thousand (1,000) feet from a residential dwelling or occupied structure, unless waived in writing by the person holding title to the residential dwelling or occupied structure;

For wind energy facilities, would locate the base of any tower at a distance of less than one-half (1/2) mile from the limits of any city or town;

For solar energy facilities:

Would locate the facility within three hundred (300) feet of an occupied structure or residence unless waived in writing by the owner of the structure or residence;

Would locate the facility within one hundred (100) feet of any outer boundary of the facility;

Would locate the facility on unzoned or agricultural zoned land less than two hundred (200) feet from any public road right-of-way or on other land less than one hundred (100) feet from any public road right-of-way.

No rule, regulation or law promulgated or applied by any county in this state shall adopt a standard less stringent than the minimum standards established in subsection (a) of this section. The minimum standards stated in subsection (a) of this section shall be incorporated into every existing or future county permitting or licensing process to which they are applicable so that no applicant for a permit under this article is required to submit more than one (1) application addressing these standards to any county.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, any board of county commissioners for solar facilities:

May vary the location and setback requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section, either on its own or by following its land use planning, zoning or conditional use processes;

For lands within the boundaries of any incorporated municipality, shall require any setbacks recommended by the governing body of the municipality within the boundaries of that municipality;

May increase setbacks required from public road rights-of-way beyond those required in this section to accommodate known big game animal migrations and frequent local wildlife movements and to reduce the risk of motor vehicle and big game animal collisions. A board of county commissioners may consult with the:

Game and fish department for setbacks from public roads;

Department of transportation for setbacks from state highways;

County’s appropriate local entity for setbacks from county roads.

No board of county commissioners shall issue a permit under W.S. 18-5-502(a) until that county has adopted rules and regulations governing the notice that the application for a permit must provide to the record owners and claimants of mineral rights located on and under lands where the facility will be constructed. The rules shall conform to rules adopted by the industrial siting council for the same purpose pursuant to W.S.

35-12-105

.

For a permit granted for a wind energy facility under this article, there shall be no vertical construction of a wind turbine within two (2) nautical miles of any active federal military missile launch or control facility, unless the owner or developer of the wind energy facility first obtains and furnishes documentation to the board of county commissioners of:

A written determination of no adverse impact on nuclear security operations from the military installation commander or the commander’s designee. The determination shall not be unreasonably withheld or denied;

A determination of no hazard from the federal aviation administration; and

Documentation from the federal military aviation and installation assurance siting clearinghouse that resolves any potential adverse impact on military operations and readiness and that commits to implement required mitigation measures.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility”; in (a)(i) substituted “wind energy facilities or solar energy facilities” for “wind energy facilities” and added “except as allowed by this section” at the end; in (a)(ii) through (a)(vi) added “For wind energy facilities” at the beginning; added (a)(vi) and made a related change; added (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); in (d) substituted “the facility” for “the wind energy facility”; and added (e).

§ 18-5-505.
Complete applications; notice.

Upon receipt of an application, the board of county commissioners shall conduct a review of the application to determine if it contains all the information required by W.S.

18-5-503

and any applicable rules and regulations. If the board of county commissioners determines that the application is incomplete, it shall within thirty (30) days of receipt of the application notify the applicant of the specific deficiencies in the application. The applicant shall provide the additional information necessary within thirty (30) days of receipt of a request for additional information from the board. When the board of county commissioners determines that the application is complete it shall notify the applicant that the application is complete and shall provide notice of the date and time at which the hearing required by W.S.

18-5-506

will be conducted.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 18-5-506.
Hearing and public comment.

Any board of county commissioners receiving an application to permit a facility shall hold a public hearing to consider public comment on the application no less than forty-five (45) days and not more than sixty (60) days after determining that the application is complete. Written comment on the application shall be accepted by the board of county commissioners for not less than forty-five (45) days after determining that the application is complete.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility.”

§ 18-5-507.
Decision of the board; findings necessary.

Within forty-five (45) days from the date of completion of the hearing required by W.S.

18-5-506

, the board shall make complete findings, issue an opinion, render a decision upon the record either granting or denying the application and state whether or not the applicant has met the standards required by this article. The decision shall be subject to the remedies provided in W.S.

18-5-508

. The board shall grant a permit if it determines that the proposed facility complies with all standards properly adopted by the board of county commissioners and the standards required by this article.

No permit shall be granted if the application is incomplete or if all notices required by W.S.

18-5-503

have not been timely given.

A copy of the decision shall be served upon the applicant.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility.”

§ 18-5-508.
Remedies.

Any party aggrieved by the final decision of the board of county commissioners may have the decision reviewed by the district court pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

When a decision is issued after hearing on an application for a permit under this article, the decision is final for purposes of judicial review.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 18-5-509.
Referral.

Any board of county commissioners which receives an application to permit a wind energy facility or solar energy facility which does not meet the definition of an industrial facility as defined in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G) may refer the facility to the industrial siting council for additional permitting consistent with the requirements of the Industrial Development Information and Siting Act, W.S.

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

, but the provisions of W.S.

39-15-111

and

39-16-111

shall not apply. A referral shall be made only when a board of county commissioners finds there are potentially significant adverse environmental, social or economic issues which the county board of commissioners does not have the expertise to consider or authority to address.

Any facility referred to the industrial siting council under this section may apply to the council for a waiver of permit application pursuant to W.S.

35-12-107

.

Upon receiving a referral pursuant to this section and within fifteen (15) days after receipt of the referral, the director of the department of environmental quality may reject the referral by giving written notice of the rejection to the county making the referral and the applicant. No appeal from the decision of the director under this subsection shall be allowed.

A referral made pursuant to this section shall not relieve a board of county commissioners from its obligation to consider whether the proposed facility should be permitted under the standards required by this article.

A referral made pursuant to this section shall be made no later than thirty (30) days after an application is deemed complete pursuant to W.S.

18-5-505

.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “wind energy facility or solar energy facility” for “wind energy facility,” “an industrial facility” for “a facility,” and “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)”; and in (d) substituted “proposed facility” for “proposed wind energy facility.”

§ 18-5-510.
Binding effect.

Upon referral of a facility to the industrial siting council pursuant to W.S.

18-5-509

, the facility shall not be withdrawn from the council’s consideration without consent of the council. Any decision by the council shall be final except as provided in this article or pursuant to the remedies provided to other facilities permitted by the council.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 18-5-511.
Revocation or suspension of permit.

A permit may be revoked or suspended for:

Any material false statement in the application or in accompanying statements or studies required of the applicant, if a true statement would have warranted the refusal to grant a permit;

Failure to comply with the terms or conditions of the permit after notice of the failure and reasonable opportunity to correct the failure;

Violation of this article, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article or valid orders of the board of county commissioners or the industrial siting council;

Failure of the proposed facility to receive a required permit from the industrial siting council pursuant to the Industrial Development Information and Siting Act, W.S.

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

;

Failure of the permitted wind energy facility to:

Transmit electricity created by wind energy for a period of two (2) consecutive years or more;

Maintain land rights necessary to operate the wind energy facility.

Failure of the permitted solar energy facility to maintain land rights necessary to operate the solar energy facility.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv) substituted “proposed facility” for “proposed wind energy facility”; and added (a)(vi) and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-5-512.
Penalties for violations.

No person shall:

Commence to construct a wind energy facility on or after July 1, 2010 or a solar energy facility on or after July 1, 2020 without first obtaining a permit required by this article;

Construct, reconstruct, operate, locate, erect, maintain, enlarge, change or use a facility, after having first obtained a permit, other than in specific compliance with the permit; or

Cause any of the acts specified in this subsection to occur.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate offense.

Any wind turbine tower, wind generator or portion thereof or any solar energy panel or facility or portion thereof erected in violation of this article shall subject the owner of the tower, generator or solar energy panel or facility to a penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) per day for every tower, generator or solar energy panel or facility so erected.

Any penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid and credited as provided by W.S.

8-1-109

.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) added “or a solar energy facility on or after July 1, 2020” preceding “without first obtaining”; in (a)(ii) substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility”; and in (c) substituted “turbine tower, wind generator or portion thereof or any solar energy panel or facility or portion thereof erected” for “turbine tower or wind generator erected,” “owner of the tower, generator or solar energy panel or facility” for “owner of the tower or generator,” and “every tower, generator or solar energy panel or facility” for “every tower or generator.”

§ 18-5-513.
Fees.

A board of county commissioners which receives an application under this article for the permitting of a facility may charge the applicant a reasonable fee which shall not exceed the reasonably anticipated costs of processing and considering the application and conducting public hearings.

The board of county commissioners also may collect a reasonable building permit fee prior to commencement of construction which shall not exceed the reasonably anticipated administrative costs of issuing the building permit and overseeing compliance with permit conditions and requirements.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 97, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “a facility” for “a wind energy facility.”